Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 189A Driving Under the Influence
189A.085.
Surrender and impoundment of motor vehicle license plates — Hardship exception for affected individuals other than offender.

Unless a person has been issued an ignition interlock license under KRS

189A.340

or a hardship license under KRS

189A.410

, a person who has been convicted of an offense under KRS

189A.010

may have the license plate or plates on all of the motor vehicles or motorcycles owned by him or her, either solely or jointly, impounded by the court of competent jurisdiction in accordance with the following procedures:

Following a court order of impoundment of a license plate or plates, the person shall physically surrender any and all license plate or plates currently in force on any motor vehicle or motorcycle owned either individually or jointly by him or her to the court at the final sentencing hearing, or within forty-five (45) days after the hearing. If the person fails to surrender his or her license plate or plates at the final sentencing hearing or within forty-five (45) days thereafter, the court may issue an order directing the sheriff or any other peace officer to seize the license plate or plates and to deliver any seized license plate or plates to the court. The order of the court suspending the license plate or plates shall not exceed the time for the suspension of the operator’s license as specified in KRS

189A.070

; and

The clerk of the court shall retain any surrendered plate or plates and then transmit all surrendered plate or plates to the Transportation Cabinet in the manner set forth by the Transportation Cabinet in administrative regulations promulgated by the Transportation Cabinet.

Upon application, the court may grant hardship exceptions to family members or other individuals affected by the surrender of any license plate or plates of any motor vehicle or motorcycle owned by the offender. Hardship exceptions may be granted by the court to the offender’s family members or other affected individuals only if the family members or other affected individuals prove to the court’s satisfaction that their inability to utilize the surrendered motor vehicles or motorcycles would pose an undue hardship upon the family members or other affected individuals. Upon the court’s granting of hardship exceptions, the clerk or the Transportation Cabinet as appropriate, shall return to the family members or other affected individuals the license plate or plates of the motor vehicles or motorcycles of the offender for their utilization. The offender shall not be permitted to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle for which the license plate has been suspended or for which a hardship exception has been granted, unless the offender has been issued an ignition interlock license under KRS

189A.340

or a hardship license under KRS

189A.410

.

If the license plate of a jointly owned vehicle is impounded, this vehicle may be transferred to a joint owner of the vehicle who was not the violator.

If the license plate of a motor vehicle is impounded, the vehicle may be transferred.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 467, § 19, effective October 1, 2000; 2010, ch. 149, § 21, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 124, § 3, effective June 24, 2015; 2019 ch. 103, § 6, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 83, § 1, effective April 6, 2022.

189A.090.
Operating motor vehicle while license is suspended for driving under the influence prohibited — Operating motor vehicle without ignition interlock license or hardship license prohibited — Penalties.

No person shall operate or be in physical control of a motor vehicle or motorcycle while his or her license is suspended under this chapter, unless the person has a valid:

Ignition interlock license in the person’s possession and:

The motor vehicle or motorcycle is equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device; or

The person is operating or in physical control of an employer’s motor vehicle or motorcycle in accordance with KRS 189A.340(6); or

Hardship license in the person’s possession.

In addition to the period of license suspension imposed by KRS

189A.070

, any person who violates subsection (1) of this section shall:

For a first offense within a ten (10) year period, be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor and have his or her license suspended by the Transportation Cabinet for six (6) months, unless at the time of the offense the person was also operating or in physical control of a motor vehicle in violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e), in which event the person shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and have his or her license suspended by the Transportation Cabinet for a period of one (1) year;

For a second offense within a ten (10) year period, be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and have his or her license suspended by the Transportation Cabinet for one (1) year, unless at the time of the offense the person was also operating or in physical control of a motor vehicle in violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e), in which event the person shall be guilty of a Class D felony and have his or her license suspended by the Transportation Cabinet for a period of two (2) years; and

For a third or subsequent offense within a ten (10) year period, be guilty of a Class D felony and have his or her license suspended by the Transportation Cabinet for two (2) years, unless at the time of the offense the person was also operating or in physical control of a motor vehicle in violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e), in which event the person shall be guilty of a Class D felony and have his or her license suspended by the Transportation Cabinet for a period of five (5) years.

Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section may apply for an ignition interlock license for the remainder of the original period of suspension under KRS

189A.070

and for the entire period of the new suspension if the person is and remains otherwise eligible for such license pursuant to KRS

189A.340

.

The ten (10) year period under this section shall be measured in the same manner as in KRS

189A.070

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 165, § 9, effective July 13, 1984; 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 22, effective July 1, 1991; 2000, ch. 467, § 7, effective October 1, 2000; 2002, ch. 171, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2010, ch. 149, § 22, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 124, § 4, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 85, § 3, effective April 9, 2016; 2019 ch. 103, § 7, effective July 1, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/2016). 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 10 provided that that Act shall be known as the Brianna Taylor Act. This statute was amended in Section 3 of that Act.

189A.100.
Administration of preliminary breath tests — Visual recording of vehicle pursuits, traffic stops, and field sobriety tests — Conditions of recording — Use and destruction of recordings.

Law enforcement agencies may administer preliminary breath tests using devices or equipment which will ensure an accurate determination of blood alcohol content. Such tests may be administered in the field to a person suspected of violation of KRS

189A.010

before the person is arrested. This test may be administered in addition to any other blood alcohol level test authorized by law. A person’s refusal to take a preliminary breath test shall not be used against him in a court of law or in any administrative proceeding.

Law enforcement agencies may record on film or videotape or by other visual and audible means:

The pursuit of a violator or suspected violator;

The traffic stop; or

Field sobriety tests administered at the scene or such tests at a police station, jail, or other suitable facility; or

The refusal of a violator or suspected violator to submit to tests under KRS

189A.103

;

for a suspected violation of KRS

189A.010

.

Recordings made under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be subject to the following conditions:

The testing is recorded in its entirety (except for blood alcohol analysis testing);

The entire recording of the field sobriety tests or refusal and the entire recording of the pursuit and traffic stop is shown in court unless the defendant waives the showing of any portions not offered by the prosecution;

The entire recording is available to be shown by the defense at trial if the defendant so desires regardless of whether it was introduced by the Commonwealth;

The defendant or his counsel is afforded an opportunity to view the entire recording a reasonable time before the trial in order to prepare an adequate defense;

Recordings shall be used for official purposes only, which shall include:

Viewing in court;

Viewing by the prosecution and defense in preparation for a trial; and

Viewing for purposes of administrative reviews and official administrative proceedings. Recordings shall otherwise be considered as confidential records;

The videotape or film taken in accordance with this section shall, upon order of the sentencing court, be destroyed after the later of the following:

Fourteen (14) months, if there is no appeal of any criminal or traffic case filed as a result of the videotape or film, or if the videotape or film does not record the actual happening of an accident involving a motor vehicle;

Fourteen (14) months after a decision has been made not to prosecute any case upon which an arrest has been made or a citation issued as a result of the videotape or film, if the videotape does not record the actual happening of an accident involving a motor vehicle;

Twenty-six (26) months, if there is no appeal of any criminal or traffic case filed as a result of the videotape or film, if the videotape or film records the actual happening of an accident involving a motor vehicle;

After all appeals have been exhausted arising from any criminal or traffic case filed as a result of the videotape;

At the conclusion of any civil case arising from events depicted on the videotape or film; or

At the conclusion of the exhaustion of all appeals arising from any law enforcement agency administrative proceedings arising from events depicted on the videotape or film; and

Public officials or employees utilizing or showing recordings other than as permitted in this chapter or permitting others to do so shall be guilty of official misconduct in the first degree.

When a peace officer makes a videotape or film recording of any transaction covered by subsection (2) of this section and a citation is issued or an arrest is made, the peace officer shall note on the uniform citation that a videotape has been made of the transaction.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 165, § 10, effective July 13, 1984; 2000, ch. 467, § 24, effective October 1, 2000; 2019 ch. 103, § 8, effective July 1, 2020.

189A.103.
Consent to tests for alcohol concentration or substance which may impair driving ability — Test procedures — Who may administer — Personal testing.

The following provisions shall apply to any person who operates or is in physical control of a motor vehicle or a vehicle that is not a motor vehicle in this Commonwealth:

He or she has given his or her consent to one (1) or more tests of his or her blood, breath, and urine, or combination thereof, for the purpose of determining alcohol concentration or presence of a substance which may impair one’s driving ability, if an officer has reasonable grounds to believe that a violation of KRS 189A.010(1) or 189.520(1) has occurred;

Any person who is dead, unconscious, or otherwise in a condition rendering him or her incapable of refusal is deemed not to have withdrawn the consent provided in subsection (1) of this section, and the test may be given;

The breath, blood, and urine tests administered pursuant to this section shall be administered at the direction of a peace officer having reasonable grounds to believe the person has committed a violation of KRS 189A.010(1) or 189.520(1).

Tests of the person’s breath, blood, or urine, to be valid pursuant to this section, shall have been performed according to the administrative regulations promulgated by the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, and shall have been performed, as to breath tests, only after a peace officer has had the person under personal observation at the location of the test for a minimum of twenty (20) minutes.

All breath tests shall be administered by a peace officer holding a certificate as an operator of a breath analysis instrument, issued by the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or his or her designee;

A breath test shall consist of a test which is performed in accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions or instructions adopted by the Department of Criminal Justice Training and approved by the manufacturer for the use of the instrument. The secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall keep available for public inspection and provide, upon request and without charge, copies of these manufacturer’s instructions or instructions adopted by the Department of Criminal Justice Training and approved by the manufacturer for all models of breath testing devices in use by the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

When the preliminary breath test, breath test, or other evidence gives the peace officer reasonable grounds to believe there is impairment by a substance which is not subject to testing by a breath test, then blood or urine tests, or both, may be required in addition to a breath test, or in lieu of a breath test;

Only a physician, registered nurse, phlebotomist, medical technician, or medical technologist not otherwise prohibited by law can withdraw any blood of any person submitting to a test under this section; and

After the person has submitted to all alcohol concentration tests and substance tests requested by the officer, the person tested shall be permitted to have a person listed in subsection (6) of this section of his or her own choosing administer a test or tests in addition to any tests administered at the direction of the peace officer. Tests conducted under this section shall be conducted within a reasonable length of time. Provided, however, the nonavailability of the person chosen to administer a test or tests in addition to those administered at the direction of the peace officer within a reasonable time shall not be grounds for rendering inadmissible as evidence the results of the test or tests administered at the direction of the peace officer.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 6, effective July 1, 1991; 2000, ch. 467, § 8, effective October 1, 2000; 2007, ch. 85, § 214, effective June 26, 2007; 2022 ch. 83, § 2, effective April 6, 2022.

189A.104.
Alcohol or substance testing subject to refusal or enhancement of penalties under KRS Chapter 189A.

The only alcohol or substance testing that is subject to refusal or enhancement of penalties provided for in this chapter is:

Breath analysis testing by an instrument installed, tested, and maintained by the Commonwealth for that specific purpose at a police station or detention facility;

Blood or urine testing at the request of the officer at a police station, detention facility, or medical facility; or

Combination of tests required in paragraphs (a) or (b) of this subsection.

The results of any breath analysis by an instrument other than one specified in subsection (1) of this section shall be inadmissible in court.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 467, § 30, effective October 1, 2000; 2022 ch. 83, § 3, effective April 6, 2022.

189A.105.
Effect of refusal to submit to tests — Information required to be provided when tests requested — Court-ordered testing — Right to consult attorney before submitting to tests — Personal testing option.

A person’s refusal to submit to tests under KRS

189A.103

shall result in suspension of his or her driving privilege as provided in this chapter.

At the time a breath, blood, or urine test is requested, the person shall be informed:

That, if the person refuses to submit to such tests:

The fact of this refusal may be used against him or her in court as evidence of violating KRS

189A.010

and will result in suspension of his or her driver’s license by the court at the time of arraignment; and

Is subsequently convicted of violating KRS

189A.010

(1):

For a second or third time within a ten (10) year period, he or she will be subject to a mandatory minimum jail sentence which is twice as long as the mandatory minimum jail sentence imposed if he or she submits to the tests; and

His or her license will be suspended by the Transportation Cabinet;

That, if a test is taken:

The results of the test may be used against the person in court as evidence of violating KRS 189A.010(1); and

The person has the right to have a test or tests of his or her blood performed by a person of his or her choosing described in KRS

189A.103

within a reasonable time of his or her arrest at the expense of the person arrested; and

That although his or her license will be suspended, he or she may be eligible immediately for an ignition interlock license allowing him or her to drive during the period of suspension and, if he or she is convicted, he or she will receive a credit toward any other ignition interlock requirement arising from this arrest.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit a judge of a court of competent jurisdiction from issuing a search warrant or other court order requiring a blood or urine test, or a combination thereof, of a defendant charged with a violation of KRS 189A.010, or other statutory violation arising from the incident. However, if the incident involves a motor vehicle accident in which there was a fatality, the investigating peace officer shall seek such a search warrant for blood testing unless the testing has already been done by consent. If testing done pursuant to a warrant reveals the presence of alcohol or any other substance that impaired the driving ability of a person who is charged and convicted of a violation of KRS 189A.010(1), the sentencing court shall require, in addition to any other sentencing provision, that the defendant make restitution to the state for the cost of the testing.

During the period immediately preceding the administration of any test, the person shall be afforded an opportunity of at least ten (10) minutes but not more than fifteen (15) minutes to attempt to contact and communicate with an attorney and shall be informed of this right. Inability to communicate with an attorney during this period shall not be deemed to relieve the person of his or her obligation to submit to the tests and the penalties specified by KRS

189A.010

and

189A.107

shall remain applicable to the person upon refusal. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to create a right to have an attorney present during the administration of the tests, but the person’s attorney may be present if the attorney can physically appear at the location where the test is to be administered within the time period established in this section.

Immediately following the administration of the final test requested by the officer, the person shall again be informed of his or her right to have a test or tests of his or her blood performed by a person of his or her choosing described in KRS

189A.103

within a reasonable time of his or her arrest at the expense of the person arrested. He or she shall then be asked “Do you want such a test?” The officer shall make reasonable efforts to provide transportation to the tests.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 7, effective July 1, 1991; 2000, ch. 467, § 9, effective October 1, 2000; 2006, ch. 116, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 149, § 23, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 124, § 5, effective June 24, 2015; 2019 ch. 103, § 9, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 83, § 4, effective April 6, 2022.

189A.107.
License suspension for refusal to take alcohol or substance tests — Hearing on alleged refusal — Time period for suspension — Notice to Transportation Cabinet.

A person who refuses to submit to an alcohol concentration or substance test requested by an officer having reasonable grounds to believe that the person violated KRS 189A.010(1) shall have his or her driver’s license suspended during the pendency of the action as provided in KRS

189A.200

.

In the event a defendant is not convicted of a violation of KRS 189A.010(1) in a case in which it is alleged that he or she refused to take an alcohol concentration or substance test, upon motion of the attorney for the Commonwealth, the court shall conduct a hearing, without a jury, to determine by clear and convincing evidence if the person actually refused the testing. However, the hearing shall not be required if the court has made a previous determination of the issue at a hearing held under KRS

189A.200

and

189A.220

.

If the court finds that the person did refuse to submit to a breath, blood, or urine test, the court shall suspend the person’s driver’s license for the period of time the license would have been suspended upon conviction as set forth in KRS 189A.070(1), except that the court may authorize the person to apply to the Transportation Cabinet for issuance of an ignition interlock license under KRS

189A.340

for the period of the suspension.

When the court orders the suspension of a person’s license pursuant to this subsection, the person shall surrender the license in the same manner prescribed by KRS

189A.200

(4). In addition, notice of the suspension shall be immediately transmitted to the Transportation Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 16, effective July 1, 1991; 2000, ch. 467, § 10, effective October 1, 2000; 2015 ch. 124, § 6, effective June 24, 2015; 2019 ch. 103, § 10, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 83, § 5, effective April 6, 2022.

189A.110.
Minimum detention in custody when breath analysis testing shows an alcohol concentration reading of .15 percent or more.

Any person who is arrested for a violation of KRS

189A.010

and who, upon breath analysis testing, shows an alcohol concentration reading of .15 percent or more shall be detained in custody at least four (4) hours following his or her arrest.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 165, § 11, effective July 13, 1984; 2022 ch. 83, § 6, effective April 6, 2022.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A blood alcohol reading need not be .16 percent in order to trigger this section; a blood alcohol reading of any amount over .15 percent will bring this section into play in order to detain a person in custody for DUI at least four hours following his arrest.

OAG 94-19

.

189A.120.
Prosecutor’s duties with regard to amendment of charges — Amendment of blood alcohol concentration — Record of charges and amendments.

When an alcohol concentration for a person twenty-one (21) years of age or older in a prosecution for violation of KRS

189A.010

is 0.08 or above, is 0.02 or above for a person under the age of twenty-one (21), or when the defendant, regardless of age, has refused to take an alcohol concentration or substance test, a prosecuting attorney shall not agree to the amendment of the charge to a lesser offense and shall oppose the amendment of the charge at trial, unless all prosecution witnesses are, and it is expected they will continue to be, unavailable for trial.

A prosecuting attorney shall not amend a blood alcohol concentration, and he or she shall oppose the amendment of the percentage, unless uncontroverted scientific evidence is presented that the test results were in error. In those cases, the prosecutor shall state his or her reasons for agreeing with the amendment, and the scientific data upon which the amendment was made shall be made a part of the record in this case.

The record of charges and disposition thereof, including reasons for amending the charges, shall be transmitted by the court to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet for inclusion in the centralized criminal history record information system under KRS

17.150

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 165, § 12, effective July 13, 1984; 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 17, effective July 1, 1991; 1996, ch. 198, § 13, effective October 1, 1996; 2000, ch. 467, § 11, effective October 1, 2000; 2007, ch. 85, § 215, effective June 26, 2007.

189A.130.
Assessment of fines — Response to nonpayment.

Fines levied pursuant to this chapter shall be assessed in the manner required by KRS 534. 020 (but in amounts consistent with this chapter) and the response to nonpayment of fines shall be governed by KRS

534.020

and

534.060

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 165, § 20(24), effective July 13, 1984; 2017 ch. 158, § 11, effective June 29, 2017.

189A.200.
Pretrial suspension of license of person charged with driving under the influence for refusing to take test, for being a repeat offender, and for causing accident resulting in death or serious physical injury to another person — Hearing — Length of suspension — When application for ignition interlock license required.

The court shall at the arraignment or as soon as such relevant information becomes available suspend the motor vehicle operator’s license and motorcycle operator’s license and driving privileges of any person charged with a violation of KRS 189A.010(1) who:

Has refused to take an alcohol concentration or substance test as reflected on the uniform citation form;

Has been convicted of one (1) or more prior offenses as described in KRS 189A.010(5)(e) or has had his or her operator’s license suspended on one (1) or more occasions for refusing to take an alcohol concentration or substance test, in the ten (10) year period immediately preceding his or her arrest; or

Was involved in an accident that resulted in death or serious physical injury as defined in KRS

500.080

to a person other than the defendant.

Persons whose licenses have been suspended pursuant to this section may file a motion for judicial review of the suspension, and the court shall conduct the review in accordance with this chapter within thirty (30) days after the filing of the motion. The court shall, at the time of the suspension, advise the defendant of his rights to the review.

When the court orders the suspension of a license pursuant to:

Subsection (1)(a) of this section, the court may, in addition to any other conditions the court may order, require that the person apply to the Transportation Cabinet for issuance of an ignition interlock license under KRS

189A.340

for the period of the suspension;

Subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section, the court shall, in addition to any other conditions the court may order, require that the person apply to the Transportation Cabinet for issuance of an ignition interlock license under KRS

189A.340

for the period of suspension; and

Subsection (1) of this section and the person is required to apply for an ignition interlock license pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, the person shall present the completed ignition interlock license application to the court

When the court orders the suspension of a license pursuant to this section, the defendant shall immediately surrender his or her license to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle to the court. Should the defendant fail to surrender his or her license to the court, the court shall issue an order directing the sheriff or any other peace officer to seize the license forthwith and deliver it to the court. If the license is currently under suspension, the provisions of this subsection shall not apply.

The Circuit Court Clerk shall forthwith transmit to the Transportation Cabinet:

Any license surrendered pursuant to this section; and

If the court ordered a person to apply for an ignition interlock device under subsection (3) of this section, notification of the order.

Licenses suspended under this section shall remain suspended until:

The person is acquitted;

All pending or current charges relating to a violation of KRS

189A.010

have been dismissed; or

The person is convicted and the Transportation Cabinet has suspended his or her license pursuant to KRS

189A.070

;

but in no event for a period longer than the license suspension period applicable to the person under KRS

189A.070

or

189A.107

.

Any person whose operator’s license has been suspended pursuant to this section shall be given credit for all pretrial suspension time against the period of suspension imposed under KRS

189A.070

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 9, effective July 1, 1991; 1996, ch. 198, § 14, effective October 1, 1996; 2000, ch. 467, § 13, effective October 1, 2000; 2015 ch. 124, § 7, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 85, § 4, effective April 9, 2016; 2019 ch. 103, § 11, effective July 1, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/2016). 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 10 provided that that Act shall be known as the Brianna Taylor Act. This statute was amended in Section 4 of that Act.

189A.210.
Duty of court clerk to obtain defendant’s driving history record upon arrest for driving while impaired.

When a defendant is arrested upon a charge of violating KRS 189A.010(1), the court clerk shall obtain forthwith the information from the defendant’s driving history record and make it a part of the record of the case.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 23, effective July 1, 1991.

189A.220.
Judicial review of pretrial license suspension for test refusal.

In any judicial review of a pretrial suspension imposed for refusal to take an alcohol concentration or substance test under KRS 189A.200(1)(a), if the court determines, by the preponderance of the evidence, that:

The person was charged and arrested by a peace officer with violation of KRS 189A.010(1);

The officer had reasonable grounds to believe that the person was operating or in physical control of a motor vehicle in violation of KRS 189A.010(1);

The person was advised of the implied consent law pursuant to KRS

189A.105

;

The peace officer requested the person to take the test or tests pursuant to KRS

189A.103

; and

The person refused to take a test requested by a peace officer pursuant to KRS

189A.103

;

then the court shall continue the suspension of the person’s operator’s license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle during the pendency of the proceedings, but in no event for a period longer than the license suspension period applicable to the person under KRS

189A.070

and

189A.107

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 10, effective July 1, 1991; 2000, ch. 467, § 14, effective October 1, 2000; 2019 ch. 103, § 12, effective July 1, 2020.

189A.230.
Judicial review of pretrial license suspension for person under twenty-one. [Repealed.]

189A.240.
Judicial review of pretrial license suspension for repeat offender.

In any judicial review of a pretrial suspension imposed under KRS 189A.200(1)(b), if the court determines by a preponderance of the evidence that:

The person was charged and arrested by a peace officer with a violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e);

The peace officer had reasonable grounds to believe that the person was operating a motor vehicle in violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e);

There is probable cause to believe that the person committed the violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) as charged; and

The person has been convicted of one (1) or more prior offenses as described in KRS 189A.010(5)(e) or has had his or her motor vehicle operator’s license suspended on one (1) or more occasions for refusing to take an alcohol concentration or substance test, in the ten (10) year period immediately preceding his or her arrest;

then the court shall continue to suspend the person’s operator’s license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle, but in no event for a period longer than the license suspension period applicable to the person under KRS

189A.070

and

189A.107

. The provisions of this section shall not be construed as limiting the person’s ability to challenge any prior convictions or license suspensions or refusals.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 12, effective July 1, 1991; 1996, ch. 198, § 15, effective October 1, 1996; 2000, ch. 467, § 21, effective October 1, 2000; 2010, ch. 149, § 24, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 124, § 13, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 85, § 5, effective April 9, 2016; 2019 ch. 103, § 13, effective July 1, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/2016). 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 10 provided that that Act shall be known as the Brianna Taylor Act. This statute was amended in Section 5 of that Act.

189A.250.
Judicial review of pretrial suspension for causing an accident resulting in death or serious physical injury to another person.

In any judicial review of a pretrial suspension imposed under KRS 189A.200(1)(c), if the court determines by a preponderance of the evidence that:

The person was charged and arrested by a peace officer with violation of KRS

189A.010

;

The officer had reasonable grounds to believe that the person was operating or in physical control of a motor vehicle in violation of KRS

189A.010

;

There is probable cause to believe that the person committed the violation of KRS 189A.010(1) as charged; and

There is probable cause to believe that the person was involved in an accident that resulted in death or serious physical injury as defined in KRS

500.080

to a person other than the defendant;

then the court shall continue the suspension of the person’s operator’s license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle during the pendency of the proceedings, but in no event for a period longer than the license suspension period applicable to the person under KRS

189A.070

and

189A.107

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 467, § 15, effective October 1, 2000; 2015 ch. 124, § 14, effective June 24, 2015; 2019 ch. 103, § 14, effective July 1, 2020.

189A.300.
Provision of alcohol test instruments to counties.

The Commonwealth shall provide at least one (1) breath alcohol analysis and simulating unit for each county, paid for by state funds received pursuant to the service fee levied in KRS

189A.050

. All units shall be approved by the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or his or her designee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 8, effective July 1, 1991; 2007, ch. 85, § 216, effective June 26, 2007.

189A.310.
Attacking admissibility of prior convictions to enhance penalties — Procedure — Standard.

A court may, upon application of the defendant or attorney for the Commonwealth or upon its own motion, and if the facts of the case so indicate, order that a prior conviction not meeting applicable case law regarding admissibility of a prior conviction cannot be used to enhance criminal penalties including license suspensions or revocations, or for other purposes for which such a conviction might be used.

The Transportation Cabinet shall give full faith and credit to any court decision meeting the requirements of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 14, effective July 1, 1991; 2000, ch. 467, § 16, effective October 1, 2000.

189A.320.
Court reporting of convictions and license revocations to Transportation Cabinet. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 15, effective July 1, 1991; repealed by 2019 ch. 103, § 25, effective July 1, 2020.

189A.330.
Reporting by clerk of cases pending more than ninety days — Actions by Attorney General and Chief Justice.

The clerk of the court in which hearings for violation of KRS

189A.010

are heard shall report to the Administrative Office of the Courts on or within five (5) working days of January 1, April 1, July 1, and October 1 of each year the cases involving violations of KRS

189A.010

which have not resulted in a final ruling by the court within one hundred eighty (180) days of the date upon which the person was charged with a violation of KRS 189A.010.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall forward a copy of the lists of these cases to the Chief Justice and the Office of the Attorney General.

Upon a determination that there is sufficient cause, the Office of the Attorney General may appoint a special prosecutor or prosecutors to assist in the disposition of these cases within a reasonable time period.

The Chief Justice may take actions deemed necessary and reasonable to facilitate the resolution of these cases within a reasonable time period.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 18, effective July 1, 1991; 2016 ch. 85, § 6, effective April 9, 2016.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/2016). 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 10 provided that that Act shall be known as the Brianna Taylor Act. This statute was amended in Section 6 of that Act.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Wiederstein, Firm Hearing and Trial Dates: A Partial Answer to Reducing Delay in the Courts, Vol. 70, No. 3, May 2006, Ky. Bench & Bar 18.